Maryland, session 2025, HB1019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 13. RELIGIOUS FREEDOM.
20–1301.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMPELLING GOVERNMENTAL INTEREST” MEANS AN INTEREST
ARISING FROM A SUBSTANTIAL THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, PEACE,
ORDER, OR GENERAL WELFARE.
(C) “EXERCISE OF RELIGION” MEANS THE PRACTICE OR OBSERVANCE OF
RELIGIOUS BELIEFS, WHETHER OR NOT COMPELLED BY OR CENTRAL TO A SYSTEM
OF RELIGIOUS BELIEF, INCLUDING OBSERVANCE UNDER ARTICLE 36 OF THE
DECLARATION OF RIGHTS OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION OR THE FREE
EXERCISE CLAUSE OF THE FIRST AMENDMENT TO THE U.S. CONSTITUTION.
(D) “GOVERNMENTAL ACTION” MEANS A LAW, A REGULATION, AN
ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER, A DECISION, A PRACTICE, OR ANY OTHER EXERCISE OF
GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY.
(E) “GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY” INCLUDES:
(1) THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION OR ANY
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION; AND
(2) ANY OFFICIAL OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE
OF THEIR EMPLOYMENT BY ANY ENTITY DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(F) “PERSON” INCLUDES:
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL; AND
(2) A RELIGIOUS ORGANIZATION, ASSOCIATION, OR CORPORATION.
20–1302.

HOUSE BILL 1019 3
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO A GOVERNMENTAL ACTION TAKEN BY A
GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025, INCLUDING A
GOVERNMENTAL ACTION TAKEN PURSUANT TO A LAW, REGULATION, POLICY,
GUIDELINE, OR OTHER AUTHORITY THAT WAS IN EFFECT PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2025,
UNLESS STATE LAW EXPRESSLY EXCLUDES THAT GOVERNMENTAL ACTION FROM
COVERAGE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
20–1303.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY MAY NOT SUBSTANTIALLY BURDEN A PERSON’S
EXERCISE OF RELIGION EVEN IF THE BURDEN RESULTS FROM A RULE OF GENERAL
APPLICABILITY.
(B) A GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORITY MAY SUBSTANTIALLY BURDEN A
PERSON’S EXERCISE OF RELIGION ONLY IF IT DEMONSTRATES THAT APPLICATION
OF THE BURDEN TO THE PERSON IS:
(1) IN FURTHERANCE OF A COMPELLING GOVERNMENTAL INTEREST;
AND
(2) THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE MEANS OF FURTHERING THAT
COMPELLING GOVERNMENTAL INTEREST.
20–1304.
(A) A PERSON AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY OBTAIN
APPROPRIATE RELIEF IN A CIVIL ACTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, APPROPRIATE RELIEF
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY INCLUDE:
(1) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(2) COMPENSATORY DAMAGES INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S
FEES.
(C) A PERSON AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE BY AN
OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF AN ENTITY DESCRIBED IN § 20–1301(E)(1) OF THIS
SUBTITLE MAY SEEK:

HOUSE BILL 1019
(1) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AGAINST THE OFFICIAL, EMPLOYEE, OR THE
ENTITY BY WHICH THE OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE IS EMPLOYED;
(2) COMPENSATORY DAMAGES AGAINST THE ENTITY BY WHICH THE
OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE IS EMPLOYED; AND
(3) IF THE OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE WAS ACTING CLEARLY OUTSIDE
THE SCOPE OF THEIR EMPLOYMENT, COMPENSATORY DAMAGES AGAINST THE
OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE.
(D) THE RIGHTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE RAISED BY A
PLAINTIFF IN AN ACTION FOR RELIEF UNDER THIS SECTION OR AS A DEFENSE TO AN
ACTION.
(E) A CLAIM FOR DAMAGES BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT
TO:
(1) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT TORT CLAIMS ACT UNDER TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 3 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; OR
(2) THE MARYLAND TORT CLAIMS ACT UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 1
OF THIS ARTICLE.
20–1305.
(A) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PROVIDING” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE
DENIAL OF FUNDING, BENEFITS, OR EXEMPTIONS.
(2) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT ANY
GOVERNMENTAL ACTION PROVIDING FUNDING, BENEFITS, OR EXEMPTIONS TO THE
EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS OR THE
MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO AFFECT, INTERPRET, OR
ADDRESS IN ANY WAY THE SUBSTANCE OF THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF
RIGHTS OR THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(C) THE PROTECTION OF RELIGIOUS LIBERTY PROVIDED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE IS IN ADDITION TO, AND DOES NOT REDUCE, THE PROTECTIONS PROVIDED
UNDER THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS OR THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.